South Dakota, session 2026, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-65-1 be AMENDED:
13-65-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Certified enrollment," the K-12 enrollment data required to be submitted to the
Department of Education by an accredited school by October fifteenth of each year
and published by the department on the department's website;
(2) "Division," the Division of Insurance in the Department of Labor and Regulation;
(3) "Educational scholarship," a grant to an eligible student to cover all or part of the
tuition and fees at a qualifying school. The average value of all scholarships
awarded by a scholarship granting organization may not exceed the per student
equivalent, as defined in § 13-13-10.1;
(4) "Eligible student," any student entering kindergarten through twelfth grade who
resides in South Dakota while receiving the educational scholarship and:
(a) Is a member of a household whose total annual income, the year before the
student enters the program, did not exceed two hundred percent of the
income standard used to qualify for a free or reduced-price lunch under the
national free or reduced-price lunch program. If sufficient funding is
available, once a student meets the initial income eligibility requirement,
the student remains income eligible for three years or if the student is
entering high school, until the student graduates high school regardless of
household income. After the initial period of income eligibility, a student
remains eligible if the student is a member of a household whose total
annual income in the prior year did not exceed two hundred fifty percent of
the income standard used to qualify for a free or reduced-price lunch; or

26.136.22 2 84
(b) Is in foster care;
(5) "Low-income eligible student," any student who is a member of a household whose
total annual income, the year before the student enters the program, did not
exceed one hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for a free or
reduced-price lunch under the national free or reduced-price lunch program;
(6) "Parent," any guardian, custodian, or other person with authority to act in place of
a parent for the child;
(7) "Program," the partners in education tax credit program established pursuant to
this chapter;
(8) "Qualifying school," any nonpublic school that operates within the boundaries of
South Dakota or any tribally controlled school on a federally recognized Indian
reservation that operates within the boundaries of South Dakota, is accredited by
the Department of Education, provides education to elementary or secondary
students, and has notified a scholarship granting organization of its intention to
participate in the program and comply with the program requirements. This term
excludes any school that receives a majority of its revenues from public funds; and
(9) "Scholarship granting organization," a nonprofit organization that complies with
the requirements of the program and provides educational scholarships to
students.
SB84 ENROLLED

26.136.22 3 84
An Act to increase thresholds for the value of and eligibility for the partners in education
scholarship.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 84
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 84 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB84 ENROLLED